pl: Forma syntezatora virtual analog: Moduł biurkowy/stołowy; Moduł kompatybilny z systemem Eurorack; Syntezator z klawiaturą; Moduł typu Rack; Inne
zh-CN: 虚拟模拟合成器外形规格: 桌面模块; 兼容 Eurorack 的模块; 键盘合成器; 机架式模块; 其他
da: Formfaktor for virtuel analog synthesizer: Desktop-/bordmodul; Eurorack-kompatibelt modul; Keyboardsynthesizer; Rackmonteringsmodul; Andet
nl: Virtuele analoge synthesizer vormfactor: Desktop-/tafelmodelmodule; Eurorack-compatibele module; Keyboardsynthesizer; Rackmount-module; Overige
ja: 仮想アナログシンセサイザーのフォームファクター: デスクトップ / テーブルトップモジュール; ユーロラック互換モジュール; キーボードシンセサイザー; ラックマウントモジュール; その他
fi: Virtuaalinen analogisen syntetisaattorin muoto: Pöytämoduuli; Eurorack-yhteensopiva moduuli; Kosketinsoitinsyntetisaattori; Räkkimoduuli; Muu
pt-PT: Formato do sintetizador analógico virtual: Módulo de mesa/superfície; Módulo compatível com Eurorack; Sintetizador de teclado; Módulo montado em bastidor; Outro
tr: Sanal analog sentezleyici form faktörü: Masaüstü/tezgah üstü modülü; Eurorack uyumlu modül; Klavye synthesizer; Rafa monte modül; Diğer
en: Virtual analog synthesizer form factor: Desktop/tabletop module; Eurorack-compatible module; Keyboard synthesizer; Rackmount module; Other
pt-BR: Sintetizador analógico virtual fator de forma: Módulo desktop/de mesa; Módulo compatível com Eurorack; Teclado sintetizador; Módulo de montagem em rack; Outro
hr-HR: Čimbenik oblika virtualnog analognog sintetizatora: Stolni modul; Modul kompatibilan s formatom Eurorack; Sintisajzer s tipkovnicom; Modul za rack; Ostalo
bg-BG: Форм-фактор на виртуален аналогов синтезатор: Модул за бюро/маса; Eurorack съвместим модул; Клавирен синтезатор; Rackmount модул; Друго
th: รูปแบบเครื่องสังเคราะห์เสียงอนาล็อกเสมือนจริง: โมดูลตั้งโต๊ะ; โมดูลรองรับ Eurorack; คีย์บอร์ดซินธิไซเซอร์; โมดูลติดตั้งบนแร็ค; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Oblika virtualnega analognega sintesajzerja: Namizni modul; Eurorack združljiv modul; Sintetizator s klaviaturo; Vgradni modul (rack); Drugo
cs: Formát virtuálního analogového syntezátoru: Stolní modul; Modul kompatibilní s formátem Eurorack; Klávesový syntezátor; Modul do racku; Jiné
el: Μορφή/σχεδιαστικός παράγοντας εικονικού αναλογικού συνθεσάιζερ: Επιτραπέζια μονάδα; Μονάδα συμβατή με Eurorack; Συνθεσάιζερ με πλήκτρα; Μονάδα rack; Άλλο
zh-TW: 虛擬類比合成器外型規格: 桌上型/桌面模組; Eurorack 相容模組; 鍵盤合成器; 機架式模組; 其他
ro-RO: Factorul de formă al sintetizatorului analogic virtual: Modul desktop / de masă; Modul compatibil Eurorack; Sintetizator cu claviatură; Modul rack; Altele
ru: Формфактор виртуального аналогового синтезатора: Настольный модуль; Модуль, совместимый с Eurorack; Клавишный синтезатор; Рэковый модуль; Другое
es: Factor de forma del sintetizador analógico virtual: Módulo de escritorio/sobremesa; Módulo compatible con Eurorack; Sintetizador de teclado; Módulo para montaje en rack; Otro
fr: Format du synthétiseur analogique virtuel: Module de bureau/table; Module compatible Eurorack; Synthétiseur à clavier; Module montable en rack; Autre
lt-LT: Virtualaus analoginio sintezatoriaus formos koeficientas: Stalinis modulis; Su „Eurorack“ suderinamas modulis; Klavišinis sintezatorius; Į spintą montuojamas modulis; Kita
sk-SK: Tvarový faktor virtuálneho analógového syntetizátora: Stolný modul; Modul kompatibilný s Eurorackom; Klávesový syntetizátor; Modul do stojana (Rack); Iné
hu: Virtuális analóg szintetizátor kialakítása: Asztali modul; Eurorack-kompatibilis modul; Szintetizátor billentyűzettel; Rackbe szerelhető modul; Egyéb
nb: Formfaktor for virtuell analog synthesizer: Skrivebords-/bordmodul; Eurorack-kompatibel modul; Keyboardsynthesizer; Rackmontert modul; Annet
vi: Hình thức của bộ tổng hợp âm thanh tương tự ảo: Mô-đun để bàn; Mô-đun tương thích Eurorack; Đàn synthesizer có bàn phím; Mô-đun gắn giá đỡ; Khác
sv: Fysiskt format för virtuell analog synthesizer: Skrivbords-/bordsmodul; Eurorack-kompatibel modul; Keyboardsynthesizer; Rackmonterad modul; Övrigt
de: Formfaktor des virtuell-analogen Synthesizers: Desktop-/Tischmodul; Eurorack-kompatibles Modul; Keyboard-Synthesizer; Rackmount-Modul; Sonstiges
ko: 가상 아날로그 신디사이저 폼 팩터: 데스크톱/테이블톱 모듈; 유로랙 호환 모듈; 키보드 신시사이저; 랙마운트 모듈; 기타
it: Fattore di forma del sintetizzatore analogico virtuale: Modulo desktop/da tavolo; Modulo compatibile con Eurorack; Sintetizzatore a tastiera; Modulo da rack; Altro